Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The department of ecology, in consultation with the department of health and community and social justice organizations, must test the following types of products for potentially harmful chemicals or chemical classes:(a) Disposable and reusable products designed to collect and absorb urine and feces; or(b) Disposable and reusable products regulated by the United States food and drug administration that are designed to collect and absorb menstruation or vaginal discharge.(2) The department of ecology must provide a technical report on the results of the tests to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.--- END ---